Missouri, session 2026, HB2418.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 660, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 660.845, to read as follows:
660.845. 1. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Missouri
Crime Victims Fund", which shall consist of moneys appropriated by the general
assembly and any gifts, contributions, grants, or other donations from any public or
private source. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with
sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund
shall be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, moneys in this fund shall be used
solely as provided in this section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
2. Moneys in the Missouri crime victims fund shall be disbursed to entitlement
jurisdictions, eligible entities, or local governmental entities that are eligible for victim
assistance grants under the federal Victims of Crime Act, Pub. L. 98-473, and related
regulations, and such jurisdictions and entities shall use such moneys for the same
purposes as an entitlement jurisdiction, eligible entity, or local governmental entity may
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2418 2
use victim assistance grants under the federal Victims of Crime Act, Pub. L. 98-473, and
related regulations.
✔